Utah statutes.
31A-15-207.   Purchasing groups -- Exemption from certain laws.

A purchasing group and its insurers are subject to all applicable laws of this state, except that a purchasing group and its insurers are exempt, in regard to liability insurance for the purchasing group, from any law that would:

(1)  prohibit the establishment of a purchasing group;

(2)  make it unlawful for an insurer to provide, or offer to provide, to a purchasing group or its members insurance on a basis providing advantages based on their loss and expense experience not afforded to other persons with respect to rates, policy forms, coverages, or other matters;

(3)  prohibit a purchasing group or its members from purchasing insurance on a group basis described in Subsection (2);

(4)  prohibit a purchasing group from obtaining insurance on a group basis because the group has not been in existence for a minimum period of time or because any member has not belonged to the group for a minimum period of time;

(5)  require that a purchasing group have a minimum number of members, common ownership or affiliation, or certain legal form;

(6)  require that a certain percentage of a purchasing group obtain insurance on a group basis;

(7)  otherwise discriminate against a purchasing group or any of its members; or

(8)  require that any insurance policy issued to a purchasing group or any of its members be countersigned by an insurance producer residing in this state.



Amended by Chapter 297, 2011 General Session

